Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
ARTICLE 4 LICENSES, CERTIFICATES, AND FEES
33-4-102.7. Colorado wildlife habitat stamp - review committee - rules - study - repeal.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that:

Protecting wildlife habitat and obtaining public access are important elements to preserving wildlife and wildlife-related recreational opportunities in Colorado;

The general assembly specifically recognizes that hunting of big game species is an activity that hundreds of thousands of residents and visitors to Colorado enjoy, which contributes significantly to state and local economies; and

Priorities for the expenditure of funds generated from the sale of habitat stamps shall include protecting big game winter range and migration corridors, acquiring public access to wildlife-related recreation, including fishing, hunting, and wildlife viewing, protecting habitat for species of concern, and preserving the diversity of wildlife enjoyed by Coloradans.

(1.5) A person eighteen years of age or older and under sixty-five years of age shall purchase a Colorado wildlife habitat stamp, or shall have purchased a lifetime Colorado wildlife habitat stamp, when applying for or purchasing a hunting or fishing license. No habitat stamp purchase is required prior to application for or purchase of such person's first two one-day hunting or fishing licenses, but a habitat stamp shall be purchased prior to applying for or purchasing a third one-day hunting or fishing license. No person is required to purchase more than one Colorado wildlife habitat stamp within a twelve-month period. Any person acquiring a license issued pursuant to section 33-4-104 and any person who is mobility-impaired, as defined by commission rules, is exempt from the requirement to purchase a Colorado wildlife habitat stamp.

Such stamp, or an authorized facsimile of such stamp, shall be in the possession of the person while hunting or fishing.

Fees for each stamp shall be as established in section 33-4-102 (1.4).

All moneys received pursuant to the issuance of the Colorado wildlife habitat stamp shall be used for the benefit of wildlife habitat or access to wildlife habitat, including costs associated with the operation and maintenance, such as weed control and fencing, of those lands purchased in fee simple by the division or those access easements acquired by the division under the Colorado wildlife habitat protection program. Revenues collected from the sale of the stamp are subject to annual appropriation. The Colorado wildlife habitat stamp review committee shall annually review proposed projects for expenditure of Colorado wildlife habitat stamp funds and make recommendations to the director and the commission. In consultation with the habitat stamp committee, the commission shall, in its discretion, ensure that, in the allocation of revenues under this section, sufficient priority is given to conserve and protect winter range and vital habitats, including migration corridors, for deer, elk, and other big game wildlife species; to improve public access for hunting, access for anglers to the waters of the state, and access for other wildlife-related recreation; to protect habitat for species of concern; and to preserve the diversity of wildlife enjoyed by Coloradans.

Repealed.

Real property interest acquisitions made by the commission pursuant to this section shall emphasize the acquisition of easements and ensure that all other avenues are pursued prior to fee simple acquisition. Conservation easements, as described in section 38-30.5-104 (2), C.R.S., and fee simple title purchases are allowed. All fee simple title purchases made with revenues collected pursuant to this section, not including purchases of water for maintenance or enhancement of aquatic habitats, such as minimum storage pools or direct flow rights purchased specifically to protect habitat, shall be primarily for the purpose of providing access to the public for wildlife-related recreation, and shall be made available to the public for hunting or fishing, subject to commission rules. The commission shall not use the power of eminent domain to obtain fee simple title or a conservation easement on real property. The commission shall comply with a seller's agreement or sections 33-1-105 and 33-1-105.5 prior to purchasing real property.

No third-party conservation easement shall be obtained using proceeds from the sale of habitat stamps unless the requesting organization contributes at least fifteen percent of the purchase price of the easement or fifteen percent of the purchase price is secured using other sources of nondivision funding; however, if, in the commission's discretion, sufficient hunting or fishing access is provided, the fifteen percent contribution requirement may be waived.

The Colorado wildlife habitat stamp committee is hereby created. The committee shall be composed of four sports persons; two representatives of national or regionally recognized conservation organizations whose missions are focused on nongame wildlife and whose membership is composed primarily of nongame wildlife users; two landowners actively engaged in agriculture; one citizen at large; and two division of parks and wildlife representatives as ex officio members, at least one of whom shall be a wildlife biologist. The sports persons shall be representative of the four quadrants of the state. Members shall be appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate. Staggered appointments shall be made so that not more than two members' terms expire in any one year, and thereafter appointments shall be for terms of four years each. Members shall be limited to two consecutive four-year terms.

Repealed.

The commission may adopt rules concerning the Colorado wildlife habitat stamp.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2027.

Prior to such repeal, the committee created in this section shall be reviewed as provided for in section 2-3-1203, C.R.S.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 472, § 3, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2009:

(2) amended and (9) added, (SB 09-235), ch. 388, pp. 2097, 2100, §§ 5, 6, effective August 5; (1), (4), and (8) amended and (1.5) added, (SB 09-235), ch. 388, p. 2097, § 5, effective July 1, 2010.

L. 2012:

(1.5), (4)(a)(I), and (4)(c) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1208, § 20, effective June 4.

L. 2013:

(1)(c), (4)(a), (4)(d), and (8)(a) amended and (4)(b), (6), and (9) repealed, (SB 13-175), ch. 243, p. 1173, § 2, effective May 18.

33-4-103. Landowner preference for hunting license - legislative declaration - rules.

Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that the wildlife resources of the state are in danger of decline from increasing population pressures and the loss of wildlife habitat. In order to encourage private landowners to provide habitat that increases wildlife populations for the benefit of all hunters, discourage the harboring of game animals on private lands during public hunting seasons, and relieve hunting pressure on public lands by increasing game hunting on private lands, the general assembly finds that it is necessary to provide an incentive-based system to landowners to provide habitat for wildlife through a hunting license allocation program that allows hunters access to the state's wildlife under the cooperative control of the private landowner.

The landowner preference program is designed to encourage hunter access to private land by enabling landowners to apply for licenses using applications based upon land ownership and wildlife benefit.

Eligibility.

A landowner who is an owner, as shown by a recorded deed, of a parcel of agricultural land of one hundred sixty acres or more and whose land meets the following requirements is eligible for the landowner preference program, also referred to in this section as the "program". The land must:

Be inhabited by the species being applied for in significant numbers throughout the year or in substantial numbers for shorter times;

Provide for the species being applied for wintering habitat, transitional habitat, calving areas, solitude areas, migration corridors, or an important food source; and

Have a history of game damage or a huntable population of the species being applied for.

For owners of one hundred sixty to six hundred thirty-nine acres, the division shall verify the size of the property and that the property meets the eligibility requirements of this subsection (2) before issuing the applications under subsection (3) of this section.

Owners of properties registered under the "wildlife conservation application program" that existed prior to July 1, 2013, remain eligible to participate in the program until the earlier of:

July 1, 2016;

The date when the ownership of the property is transferred to a person who is not within the immediate family of the owner; or

The date when the owner of land no longer is in compliance with this section or any rule promulgated under this section.

Applications - availability.

After determining a landowner is eligible and in compliance with this section, the division shall issue the landowner applications for licenses permitting the hunting of deer, elk, pronghorn, and such other species, except for moose, rocky mountain big horn sheep, desert big horn sheep, and rocky mountain goat, that meet the commission's animal management objectives for the game management unit where the property lies, in an amount determined by this subsection (3).

In game management units west of interstate highway 25:

Ten percent of the number of licenses established for each management area where firearm hunting licenses are totally limited are available for eligible landowners; and

An additional ten percent of the number of licenses established for each management area where firearm hunting licenses are totally limited are available for eligible landowners if these licenses are restricted to use on private land in the designated management area.

In game management units east of interstate highway 25:

Fifteen percent of the number of licenses established for each management area where firearm hunting licenses are totally limited are available for eligible landowners; and

An additional ten percent of the number of licenses established for each management area where firearm hunting licenses are totally limited are made available for eligible landowners if these licenses are restricted to use on private land by the applicant's immediate family members or youth under eighteen years of age.

The division shall make licenses not used by eligible landowners available to the general public.

The applications available under this subsection (3) are allocated to a participant based upon the following schedule:

For owners of one hundred sixty to one thousand two hundred thirty-nine acres, one application;

For owners of six hundred forty to one thousand two hundred thirty-nine acres, an additional application for a license restricted to private land if the division has verified that the land meets the conditions required for eligibility under paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section; and

For owners of one thousand two hundred forty or more acres, one additional application for each additional six hundred acres more than one thousand two hundred forty acres, not to exceed nineteen applications or the limit imposed by subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c).

Landowners may obtain more than eight applications only if the division has verified that the land is the size reported by the landowner and meets the conditions required for eligibility under paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section.

Requirements - vouchers. In addition to the limitation on the number of applications available under the program, the program has the following additional requirements and authorizations:

Successful applicants receive a voucher that may be transferred to any person who is eligible for a big game license for that species, to be used for the purchase of a license to be used only within the applicant's game management unit for that species and in accordance with any restrictions imposed by this section.

The transfer of a license voucher by a landowner must include permission to access and hunt the lands yielding the license under the program during the entire season that the license is issued. The permission must not discriminate among hunters entering the property or contain restrictions other than manner of access, including foot, horseback, or vehicular restrictions reasonably necessary to prevent damage to property.

Except as authorized by paragraph (a) of this subsection (4), a voucher that has been transferred by any person who is not the landowner or land manager is void. A voucher that is brokered for another person is void. A hunting license obtained for use with a void voucher is also void.

If a landowner submits one or more applications that fail to yield a license, the division shall give a preference in succeeding years to one application of that landowner for each application of the same landowner that failed to yield a license.

In game management units where hunting is totally limited for a species, and where eligible landowners do not use the number of landowner preference licenses established for a species for that management area, the division shall make the unused licenses available to private landowners in that particular game management unit or data analysis unit as a first priority before making them available to the general public hunter.

A landowner may receive no more than three times the number of leftover applications than the number of initial applications authorized under paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of this section.

If a landowner or hunter fails to comply with this section or any rule promulgated under this section, the division may disqualify the person from participation in the program for up to five years.

The commission shall adopt rules to implement this section prior to July 1, 2014.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 436, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-11-3.

L. 72:

p. 333, § 31.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 1307, § 8, effective July 14.

L. 84:

Entire section R&RE, p. 920, § 5, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 2000:

(3) added, p. 1590, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2005:

IP(1) and (3)(c)(I) amended, p. 475, § 7, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2008:

(3)(d)(I) amended, p. 535, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-188), ch. 244, p. 1177, § 1, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-4-105.5 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act amending subsection (3)(d)(I), see section 1 of chapter 158, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

33-4-104. Free licenses issued - members or veterans of armed forces - when - rules.

Any active or retired member of the United States armed forces while stationed as a resident patient at any United States armed forces hospital or convalescent station located within Colorado, any resident patient at a veterans administration hospital and resident patients of any state institution for the treatment of persons with behavioral or mental health disorders or other mental health institution in Colorado while under supervision of a proper staff member, and any resident who is totally and permanently disabled as determined by the social security administration or the division of labor standards and statistics or pursuant to rule of the commission may obtain a fishing license free of charge, valid for taking fish during the period of residency only, under rules of the commission.

Any Colorado resident on active duty outside this state with any branch of the armed forces of the United States may obtain, from the division of parks and wildlife, a fishing license free of charge, valid for taking fish while such person is in this state on temporary leave from such duty, but not to exceed a total of thirty days during any year.

Any resident of this state who has received a purple heart for service in the United States armed forces or who is a disabled veteran may obtain from the division of parks and wildlife, free of charge, a lifetime resident combination small game hunting and fishing license.

For the purposes of this subsection (3), "disabled veteran" means an individual who is a resident as defined in section 33-1-102 (38), has served on active duty in the armed forces, has been separated therefrom under honorable conditions, and has established to the division of parks and wildlife the presence of a service-connected disability which has been rated by the veterans administration at sixty percent or more through disability retirement benefits or a pension because of a public statute administered by the veterans administration or the department of the Army, Navy, or Air Force.

The commission may adopt appropriate rules to establish a preference for active duty members of the United States armed forces who are stationed at any military facility located in Colorado or are Colorado residents upon their return from service outside of the United States for licenses left over after completion of the division's annual limited license draw. The preference may allow for such a member of the United States armed forces to apply for preference points for any limited license draw that occurred during the member's absence.

A person assigned to the warrior transition battalion may obtain from the division a fishing license free of charge.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 436, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-11-4.

L. 71:

p. 605, § 1.

L. 72:

p. 333, § 32.

L. 75:

(1) and (2) amended and (3) added, p. 1320, § 1, effective January 1, 1976.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 1290, § 3, effective January 1, 1984.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 502, § 124, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(4) added, p. 1167, § 1, effective May 25; (1) amended, p. 1408, § 78, effective August 7.

L. 2007:

(4) amended, p. 586, § 2, effective April 19.

L. 2008:

(3)(a) amended, p. 640, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

(5) added, (HB 13-1232), ch. 105, p. 367, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1323), ch. 131, p. 382, § 22, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1380, § 303, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

33-4-104.5. Free licenses issued - first responders with a permanent occupational disability - definition.

Any resident of the state who is a first responder with a permanent occupational disability may obtain from the division, free of charge, a lifetime resident combination small game hunting and fishing license.

For purposes of this section, "first responder with a permanent occupational disability" means an individual who is a resident, as defined in section 33-1-102 (38), and:

Is a retired member of the fire and police pension association, as defined in section 31-31-102 (6), who has established to the division that he or she has been found to have, as the result of an injury received while performing official duties or an occupational disease arising out of and in the course of performing official duties, a permanent occupational disability, as defined in section 31-31-801 (3.2), by the fire and police pension association; or

Served as a peace officer, as defined in section 16-2.5-101, or as a firefighter, as defined in section 29-5-203 (10), and has established to the division that he or she has, as the result of an injury received while performing official duties or an occupational disease arising out of and in the course of performing official duties, a permanent occupational disability as defined in section 31-31-801 (3.2).

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1080), ch. 222, p. 2250, § 1, effective August 2.

33-4-105. Licenses for residents sixty-four years of age or over. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 437, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-11-5.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1321, § 2, effective January 1, 1976.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 1291, § 8, effective January 1, 1984.

33-4-105.5. Landowner preference for hunting license. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1322, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1218, § 12, effective June 21.

L. 83:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1294, § 1, effective January 1, 1984.

L. 84:

Entire section repealed, p. 925, 19, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section was relocated to § 33-4-103 in 1984.

33-4-106. Miscellaneous licenses, permits, stamps, cards, passes, and certificates - fees. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 437, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-11-6.

L. 71:

p. 604, § 5.

L. 72:

pp. 333, 334, §§ 33, 34.

L. 73:

pp. 647, 654, §§ 8, 33.

L. 75:

(1) and (2) R&RE, pp. 1318, 1324, §§ 2, 1.

L. 77:

(1)(m), (1)(aa), (2)(a)(I), (2)(a)(II), (2)(a)(IV), and (2)(b)(I) amended, (1)(t) repealed, and (1)(cc) to (1)(ff) added, pp. 1526, 1537, 1542, §§ 15, 44, 1, 2.

L. 78:

(2)(b)(II) amended, p. 273, § 95.

L. 79:

(1)(e) and (1)(n) to (1)(p) repealed, p. 1612, § 9(2), effective June 7; (1)(e) repealed, p. 1223, § 29, effective June 21; (2)(a)(III) to (2)(a)(VII) amended and (2)(a)(VIII) to (2)(a)(XI) added, p.1226, § 5, effective January 1, 1980.

L. 80:

(2)(a)(I) amended, p. 686, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 81:

(2)(b)(I) amended, p. 1656, § 1, effective May 28.

L. 82:

(1)(gg) added, p. 518, § 2, effective March 11.

L. 83:

(1)(l) repealed, p. 1292, § 2, p. 1292, § 2, effective May 21; (2)(a)(I)(A) repealed, p. 2051, § 21, effective October 14; (1)(hh) added by revision, p. 1291, §§ 8, 9.

L. 84:

Entire section repealed, p. 925, § 19, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section was relocated to § 33-4-102 in 1984.

33-4-107. Permit to collect for scientific purposes. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 438, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-11-7.

L. 72:

p. 334, § 35.

L. 73:

p. 647, § 9.

L. 75:

(3) amended, p. 1307, § 9, effective July 14.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1527, § 16, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 1291, § 8, effective January 1, 1984.

33-4-108. Certificate of lawful possession. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 439, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-11-8.

L. 72:

p. 334, § 36.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1527, § 17, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 1291, § 8, effective January 1, 1984.

33-4-109. Specimens may be held - when. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 439, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-11-9.

L. 73:

p. 648, § 10.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 1291, § 8, effective January 1, 1984.

33-4-110. Duplicate tags. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 439, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-11-10.

L. 72:

p. 335, § 37.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 1291, § 8, effective January 1, 1984.

33-4-111. Taxidermists must have license. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 439, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-11-11.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1527, § 18, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 79:

Entire section repealed, p. 1612, § 9, effective June 7; entire section repealed, p. 1223, § 29, effective June 21.

33-4-112. License agents - reports - board of claims. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 439, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-11-12.

L. 72:

pp. 335, 598, §§ 38, 85.

L. 73:

p. 648, § 11.

L. 76:

(9) added, p. 717, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 77:

(1) and (9)(b) amended and (10) added, p. 1544, § 1, effective May 24; (1) amended, p. 1527, § 19, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1227, § 6, effective January 1, 1980.

L. 84:

Entire section repealed, p. 925, § 19, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section was relocated to §§ 33-4-101 and 33-12-104 in 1984.

33-4-113. Certificate of competency and safety - when necessary. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 441, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-11-13.

L. 72:

p. 559, § 86.

L. 84:

Entire section repealed, p. 925, § 19, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section was relocated to § 33-6-107 (8) in 1984.

33-4-114. Course in hunter safety and competency. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 441, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-11-14.

L. 72:

p. 336, § 39.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 1307, § 10, effective July 14.

L. 84:

Entire section repealed, p. 925, § 19, effective January 1, 1985.

33-4-115. Division of wildlife to coordinate statewide programs. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 441, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-11-15.

L. 72:

p. 336, § 40.

L. 75:

(2) repealed, p. 1313, § 35, effective July 14.

L. 84:

Entire section repealed, p. 925, § 19, effective January 1, 1985.

33-4-116. Big game hunting licenses - auction or raffle - use of proceeds - rules.

The division is authorized to issue up to two either-sex rocky mountain bighorn sheep licenses, two either-sex rocky mountain goat licenses, two either-sex shiras moose licenses, four either-sex mule or white-tailed deer licenses, four either-sex rocky mountain elk licenses, and four either-sex pronghorn licenses each year through a competitive auction or raffle.

A nonprofit organization directly involved in the conservation of wildlife in Colorado or the division may be authorized by the commission to conduct the license auction or raffle. All such auctions and raffles shall be conducted pursuant to Colorado law.

Except as specified in this subsection (2), all proceeds from the auction or raffle of rocky mountain bighorn sheep, rocky mountain goat, and shiras moose licenses shall be used by the division for the benefit of rocky mountain bighorn or desert sheep, rocky mountain goats, and shiras moose in Colorado, and all proceeds from the auction or raffle of mule and white-tailed deer, rocky mountain elk, and pronghorn licenses shall be used by the division for the benefit of mule and white-tailed deer, rocky mountain elk, and pronghorn in Colorado.

If an auction or raffle is conducted by a nonprofit organization, the organization may retain up to twenty-five percent of the proceeds of the auction or raffle to cover auction or raffle costs and to fund projects of its own choosing that benefit wildlife in Colorado.

The proceeds from the auctions and raffles shall be in addition to any moneys otherwise provided for the management of rocky mountain bighorn or desert sheep, rocky mountain goats, shiras moose, mule and white-tailed deer, rocky mountain elk, and pronghorn.

The commission may promulgate rules pertaining to auction and raffle licenses, the conduct of the auctions and raffles, record-keeping requirements, the expenditure of proceeds, including requiring consultation by the division with advisory committees comprised of representatives of the participating nonprofit organizations prior to the expenditure of any proceeds, and any other rules necessary to implement the auction and raffle program.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 1159, § 1, effective April 9.

L. 93:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 507, § 2, effective April 26.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 454, § 1, effective May 16.

L. 96:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1221, § 16, effective August 7.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 911, § 1, effective August 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act amending subsection (2)(b), see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996.

33-4-116.5. Auction or raffle of deer, elk, and pronghorn licenses - use of proceeds. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1579, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(a), (1)(b)(III), (2)(a)(III), and (2)(b) amended, p. 475, § 8, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 912, § 2, effective August 7.

33-4-117. Youth and young adult licenses - terminally ill hunters - special restrictions and privileges - rules.

A person under eighteen years of age may obtain a youth small game hunting license, issued pursuant to section 33-4-102 (1.4)(x), upon showing a hunter education certificate as required by section 33-6-107 (8). The fee for the license, as established in section 33-4-102 (1.4)(x), includes the backcountry search and rescue fund surcharge imposed under section 33-1-112.5 (2)(a).

Every person under sixteen years of age hunting with a youth small game hunting license shall at all times be accompanied by a person eighteen years of age or older as required by section 33-6-107 (3.5); except that a person of any age who purchases a small game hunting license issued pursuant to section 33-4-102 (1.4)(f) is exempt from this restriction.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 1031, § 7, effective July 1, 2003.)

Youth big game licenses, entitling the holder to hunt deer, elk, or pronghorn, may be purchased by persons who are at least twelve years of age but under eighteen years of age for the fees specified in section 33-4-102 (1.4)(w). Said fees include the backcountry search and rescue fund surcharge imposed under section 33-1-112.5 (2)(a). Persons under sixteen years of age hunting deer, elk, or pronghorn must be accompanied by a person eighteen years of age or older as required by section 33-6-107 (4).

(4.5) The commission is authorized to establish a special licensing program for hunters eligible for a youth license under the provisions of this section, and to adopt rules that establish a hunting license preference for youth hunters. In connection with such a program the commission is also authorized, within its discretion, to establish a special licensing program for adult mentors of youth hunters and to adopt rules that establish a hunting license preference for such adult mentors.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 83, § 1, effective August 4, 2004.)

The commission is authorized to establish a special licensing program for hunters twenty-one years of age or younger who suffer from a terminal illness or a life-threatening disease or injury and to adopt rules that establish a hunting license preference for such hunters.

The commission may establish by rule a special licensing program for young adult hunters and anglers. If the commission establishes a special licensing program, the commission shall define "young adult" by rule, but shall not define "young adult" in a manner that includes adults twenty-two years of age or older.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1219, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 98:

(4.5) added, p. 859, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 99:

(3) and (5) amended, p. 1337, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2003:

(1) to (3) amended, p. 1031, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(5) amended, p. 83, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(4) amended, p. 476, § 9, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2006:

(1), (2), and (4) amended and (6) added, p. 651, § 1, effective January 1, 2007.

L. 2018:

(1) amended and (7) added, (SB 18-143), ch. 207, p. 1334, § 8, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(1) and (4) amended, (SB 21-245), ch. 358, p. 2338, § 5, effective June 27.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 209, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

(2) For the short title ("Hunting, Fishing, and Parks for Future Generations Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 18-143, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 207, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

(3) For the legislative declaration in SB 21-245, see section 1 of chapter 358, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

33-4-118. Hiking certificates. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1734, § 2, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2001:

Entire section repealed, p. 601, § 2, effective July 1.

33-4-119. Mobility-impaired hunters.

The commission is authorized to establish a special licensing program for mobility-impaired hunters.

The commission is authorized to adopt appropriate rules that define "mobility-impaired" and establish a hunting license preference for the mobility-impaired.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 859, § 2, effective May 26.

33-4-120. Wildlife council - creation.

The director of the division shall appoint nine individuals, at least three of whom are from the western slope, to act as the wildlife council, referred to in this section as the "council". The council has statewide responsibility and authority.

The council shall consist of the following members:

Two sports persons who purchase big game licenses on a regular basis in Colorado, one of whom is from the western slope;

Two sports persons who purchase fishing licenses on a regular basis in Colorado, one of whom is from the western slope;

One person representing local counties in rural areas of Colorado, the economies of which have a substantial income from hunting or fishing recreation;

One person representing municipalities in rural areas of Colorado, the economies of which have a substantial income from hunting or fishing recreation;

One person representing the division of parks and wildlife;

One person, who shall not be an employee of the division, with a substantial background in media and marketing operations; and

One person representing agricultural producers.

The council members appointed pursuant to sub-subparagraphs (A) and (B) of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) shall be nominated by organized sports person groups with regional or statewide membership. The council members appointed pursuant to sub-subparagraphs (C) and (D) of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) shall be nominated by organizations that represent the interests of such counties and municipalities.

All members of the council shall be residents of the state of Colorado.

Every effort shall be made by the director to appoint members from all geographic areas of the state.

A member shall serve for no more than two terms; except that no member representing the division of parks and wildlife shall be so limited. The appointments to the council shall be as follows:

The initial terms for the two members representing sports persons who hunt shall be two years for one member of said group and four years for the other member of said group.

The initial terms for the two members representing sports persons who fish shall be two years for one member of said group and four years for the other member of said group.

The initial term length for the member representing the division shall be at the discretion of the director of the division.

The initial term length for the member representing counties and for the member representing agricultural producers shall be four years.

The initial term length for the member representing municipalities and for the member with substantial experience in media and marketing operations shall be two years.

After the initial appointments, all subsequent appointments shall be for four years.

Members of the council shall be compensated from the wildlife cash fund created in section 33-1-112 (1), for the reasonable and necessary expenses they incur in connection with their activities for the council.

The council shall perform the following duties:

Oversee the design of a comprehensive media-based public information program to educate the general public about the benefits of wildlife, wildlife management, and wildlife-related recreational opportunities in Colorado, specifically hunting and fishing;

Prepare an operational plan for the director's approval no later than December 1, 1998;

Expend moneys from the wildlife management public education fund in accordance with the operational plan approved by the director; except that all such expenditures shall be within the scope of the activities and funding levels authorized in such operational plan.

Repealed.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to be a mechanism to substitute funding that would otherwise be available for expenditure by the division, or to replace or reduce the obligation of the division to carry out public information programs under this title.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 855, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1)(e)(III) amended and (1)(f) added, p. 1397, § 4, effective June 4.

L. 2004:

(3)(a) repealed, p. 1525, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(3)(b) repealed, p. 781, § 69, effective June 1.

L. 2018:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 18-143), ch. 207, p. 1335, § 9, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1)(f) provided for the repeal of subsection (1)(f), effective July 1, 2009. (See L. 99, p. 1397.)

Cross references:

For the short title ("Hunting, Fishing, and Parks for Future Generations Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 18-143, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 207, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.